North Dakota statutes. TITLE 12 Corrections, Parole, and Probation
CHAPTER 12-60 Bureau of Criminal Investigation

12-60-01.
Bureau created.

A bureau of the state government, under the attorney general, is hereby created and is designated as the bureau of criminal investigation, hereinafter referred to as the bureau.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 111, § 1; 1971, ch. 140, § 1.

12-60-02.
Board of managers — Selection of members — Qualifications. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 141, § 1.

12-60-03.
Terms of office — Filling of vacancies. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 141, § 1.

12-60-04.
Duty of board — Salaries. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 141, § 1.

12-60-05.
Attorney general — Duties — Appointment of personnel.

The attorney general shall act as superintendent of the bureau and shall have the responsibility of and shall exercise absolute control and management of the bureau. The attorney general shall appoint and fix the salary of a chief of the bureau, such special agents, and such other employees as the attorney general deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter within the limits of legislative appropriations therefor. The attorney general may appoint ad hoc special agents. Ad hoc special agents are law enforcement officers from other jurisdictions appointed for a specific law enforcement purpose and do not become full-time or part-time employees of the attorney general.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 111, §§ 6, 7; 1967, ch. 117, § 7; 1983, ch. 556, § 1; 2017, ch. 366, § 1, effective February 23, 2017.

12-60-06.
Furnishing of equipment.

The attorney general shall provide the bureau with necessary furniture, fixtures, apparatus, appurtenances, appliances, materials, and equipment as the attorney general deems necessary for the collection, filing, and preservation of all records required by law to be filed with the bureau or which the attorney general may authorize to require or procure respecting the identification and investigation of criminals, the investigation of crime and detection of the perpetrators thereof, and identification and information concerning stolen, lost, found, pledged, or pawned property.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 111, § 8.

12-60-07.
Powers, duties, and functions of bureau.

The bureau shall cooperate with and assist the criminal bureau of the department of justice at Washington, D.C., and similar departments in other states in establishing and carrying on a complete system of criminal identification.

The bureau shall cooperate with and assist all judges, state’s attorneys, sheriffs, chiefs of police, and all other law enforcement officers of this or any other state and of the federal government in establishing such system of criminal identification.

The bureau is the state central repository for the collection, maintenance, and dissemination of criminal history record information.

The bureau shall assist the sheriffs and other peace officers in establishing a system for the apprehension of criminals and detection of crime.

When called upon by any state’s attorney, sheriff, police officer, marshal, or other peace officers, the superintendent, chief of the bureau, and their investigators may assist, aid, and cooperate in the investigation, apprehension, arrest, detention, and conviction of all persons believed to be guilty of committing any felony within the state.

The bureau shall perform such other duties in the investigation, detection, apprehension, prosecution, or suppression of crimes as may be assigned by the attorney general in the performance of the attorney general’s duties.

The bureau shall provide assistance from time to time in conducting police schools for training peace officers in their powers and duties, and in the use of approved methods for detection, identification, and apprehension of criminals and require attendance at such police schools.

The bureau shall perform the inspection and enforcement duties for the attorney general’s licensing department.

The bureau shall detect and apprehend persons illegally possessing or disposing of drugs.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 111, § 9; 1967, ch. 116, § 1; 1971, ch. 142, § 1; 1973, ch. 114, § 1; 1987, ch. 162, § 11.

12-60-07.1.
Automated biometric data identification system.

The bureau may establish and maintain an automated biometric data identification system for this state. The bureau may cooperate with other states for the operation of a regional automated biometric data identification system.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 123, § 1; 2015, ch. 96, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 96, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

12-60-08.
Powers of investigators.

For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the investigators shall have all the powers conferred by law upon any peace officer of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 111, § 10.

12-60-08.1.
Power of the attorney general to issue subpoenas in bureau investigations.

The attorney general may issue an administrative subpoena compelling the recipient to provide records or information to an agent of the bureau of criminal investigation in any criminal matter being investigated by the bureau.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 121, § 1.

12-60-09.
Authorization of attorney general for investigations.

No investigation of the acts or conduct of any state agency or state official shall be investigated or made through or by the bureau or any employee thereof, without the authorization of the attorney general particularly specifying the office, department, or person to be investigated and the scope and purposes of the investigation.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 111, § 11.

12-60-10.
Fingerprints, photographs, description of persons charged with felony to be procured and filed. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 162, § 12.

12-60-11.
Enforcement officers to send fingerprints and descriptions of felons to the bureau — Report of the bureau to arresting officer. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 162, § 12.

12-60-12.
Officer may send fingerprints of persons having certain property in possession. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 162, § 12.

12-60-13.
Court to ascertain criminal record of defendant — Furnish information of offense to the bureau.

The judge of the district court of the county in which a defendant is to be sentenced, or the state’s attorney or sheriff thereof, shall ascertain the criminal record of every defendant convicted of a felony before sentence is passed on said defendant. The state’s attorneys and sheriffs, upon the request of the chief of the bureau or the attorney general, shall furnish to the chief of the bureau a statement of facts relative to the commission or alleged commission of all felonies within their respective counties upon such blanks or in such form as may be requested by the chief of the bureau or the attorney general.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 111, § 15.

12-60-13.1.
County and city officials to furnish crime statistics to superintendent. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 556, § 6.

12-60-14.
Violation of chapter — Misdemeanor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

12-60-15.
Duty to furnish information. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 162, § 12.

12-60-16.
Report of arrested person’s transfer, release, or disposition of case. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 162, § 12.

12-60-16.1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter and in section 12.1-32-15, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Biometric data” includes fingerprints, palm prints, voice prints, retinal or iris images, facial recognition, and DNA profiles.

“Bureau” means the bureau of criminal investigation.

“Court” means the supreme court, district courts, and municipal courts of the North Dakota judicial system.

“Criminal history record” means the compilation of criminal history record information of a person reported to the bureau in accordance with this chapter.

“Criminal history record information” includes information collected by criminal justice agencies on individuals consisting of identifiable descriptions and notations of arrests, detentions, indictments, information, or other criminal charges, any dispositions arising therefrom, sentencing, correctional supervision, and release.

“Criminal justice agency” means any government law enforcement agency or entity authorized by law to provide information regarding, or to exercise the powers of, arrest, detention, prosecution, correctional supervision, rehabilitation, or release of persons suspected in, charged with, or convicted of, a crime.

“Disseminate” means to transmit criminal history record information in any oral or written form. The term does not include:

The transmittal of the information within a criminal justice agency.

The reporting of the information as required by section 12-60-16.2.

The transmittal of the information between criminal justice agencies in order to permit the initiation of subsequent criminal justice proceedings against a person relating to the same offense.

“Noncriminal justice agency” means an entity that is not a criminal justice agency.

“Record subject” means the person who is the primary subject of a criminal history record. The term includes any representative designated by that person by power of attorney or notarized authorization. If the subject of the record is under legal disability, the term includes that person’s parents or duly appointed legal representative.

“Reportable event” means an interaction with a criminal justice agency for which a report is required to be filed under section 12-60-16.2. The term includes only those events in which the subject of the event is an adult or a juvenile adjudicated as an adult.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 162, § 1; 1989, ch. 159, § 1; 1991, ch. 326, § 39; 2009, ch. 122, § 1; 2015, ch. 96, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 96, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

12-60-16.2.
Criminal history record information — Reportable events.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 12-60-16.1 through 12-60-16.10, each criminal justice agency shall report to the bureau the information described in this section for each felony and reportable offense so designated pursuant to section 12-60-16.4. The bureau may require the criminal justice agency to provide the information in a manner that the bureau determines to be the most efficient or accurate means of collection. The following criminal justice agencies shall perform the duties indicated:

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, each criminal justice agency that makes an arrest for a reportable offense shall, with respect to that offense and the person arrested, furnish to the bureau the necessary biometric data, charges, and descriptions of the person arrested. If the arrest is made by a criminal justice agency that is a state law enforcement agency, then, on request of the arresting agency, a sheriff or jail administrator shall collect the necessary biometric data. The arresting agency shall then furnish the required information to the bureau. If a decision is made not to refer the arrest for prosecution, the criminal justice agency making that decision shall report the decision to the bureau. A criminal justice agency may make agreements with other criminal justice agencies for the purpose of furnishing to the bureau information required under this subsection.

The prosecuting attorney shall notify the bureau of all charges filed, including all those added after the filing of a criminal court case, and whether charges were not filed in criminal cases for which the bureau has a record of an arrest.

After the court pronounces sentence for a reportable offense, and if the necessary biometric data of the person being sentenced has not been collected with respect to that case, the prosecuting attorney shall ask the court to order a law enforcement agency to collect the necessary biometric data from that person. If the court determines that the necessary biometric data of the person being so sentenced has not previously been collected for the same case, the court shall order the necessary biometric data to be collected from that person. The law enforcement agency shall forward the necessary biometric data to the bureau.

The prosecuting attorney having jurisdiction over a reportable offense shall furnish the bureau all final dispositions of criminal cases for which the bureau has a record of an arrest or a record of biometric data reported under subsection 3. For each charge, this information must include at least the following:

Judgments of not guilty, judgments of guilty including the sentence pronounced by the court, discharges, and dismissals in the trial court;

Reviewing court orders filed with the clerk of the court which reverse or remand a reported conviction or which vacate or modify a sentence; and

Judgments terminating or revoking a sentence to probation and any resentencing after such a revocation.

The North Dakota department of corrections and rehabilitation, pardon clerk, parole board, and local correctional facility administrators shall furnish the bureau with all information concerning the receipt, escape, death, release, pardon, conditional pardon, reprieve, parole, commutation of sentence, or discharge of an individual who has been sentenced to that agency’s custody for any reportable offense which is required to be collected, maintained, or disseminated by the bureau. In the case of an escape from custody or death while in custody, information concerning the receipt and escape or death must also be furnished.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 162, § 2; 1989, ch. 159, § 2; 1997, ch. 115, § 2; 2003, ch. 506, § 2; 2015, ch. 96, § 3, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 96, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

12-60-16.3.
Criminal history record information — Rulemaking required.

The attorney general shall adopt appropriate rules for criminal justice agencies regarding the reporting, collecting, maintaining, and disseminating of criminal history record information. The rules must include:

Policies and procedures to be used by criminal justice agencies regarding:

Security of criminal history record information.

Inspection and challenging of criminal history record information by a record subject.

Auditing of criminal history record information to ensure that it is accurate and complete and that it is reported, collected, maintained, and disseminated in accordance with sections 12-60-16.1 through 12-60-16.10.

Development and content of agreements between the bureau and criminal justice agencies providing for reporting of and access to criminal history record information.

Use of criminal history record information for the purpose of research and statistical analysis of criminal activity.

Criteria under which criminal history records are purged or sealed.

Reportable events to be reported by each criminal justice agency, in order to avoid duplication in reporting.

Time requirements for reporting criminal history record information to the bureau.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 162, § 3.

12-60-16.4.
Criminal history record information — Reportable offenses.

Criminal justice agencies shall report to the bureau reportable events for each felony and for each of the following offenses:

Class A and B misdemeanor offenses in sections 6-08-16 and 6-08-16.1.

Class A misdemeanor offenses included in title 12.1.

Class A and B misdemeanor offenses in chapters 19-03.1, 19-03.2, and 19-03.4 and in sections 12-47-21 and 20.1-01-18.

Class B misdemeanor offenses in sections 12.1-17-01, 12.1-17-01.2, 12.1-20-12.1, 12.1-21-05, 12.1-21-06, 12.1-22-03, 12.1-23-05, and 12.1-29-03.

Class A misdemeanor offenses in chapter 14-07.1 and sections 43-15.1-02, 51-16.1-04, and 53-06.1-16.

Class A misdemeanor offenses in title 62.1.

Municipal ordinance violations that are equivalent to misdemeanors listed in subsections 1 through 6.

Infractions and misdemeanor violations of subdivision c of subsection 5 of section 39-24-09 and chapter 39-24.1.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 162, § 4; 1989, ch. 159, § 3; 1997, ch. 117, § 1; 1997, ch. 347, § 1; 1997, ch. 428, § 1; 2003, ch. 184, § 1; 2019, ch. 107, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Note.

The offense described in section 12.1-20-12.1, referred to in subsection 4 above, is a Class A misdemeanor, pursuant to S.L. 2001, ch. 134, § 5.

None of the offenses described in section 12.1-20-12.1, which is referenced in subsection 4 above, is a Class B misdemeanor.

12-60-16.5.
Criminal history record information — Exchange of information among criminal justice agencies and the courts.

The bureau and other criminal justice agencies shall disclose criminal history record information:

To a criminal justice agency that requests the information for its functions as a criminal justice agency or for use in hiring or retaining its employees.

To a court, on request, to aid in a decision concerning sentence, probation, release pending trial or appeal, or a name change petition.

Pursuant to a judicial, legislative, or administrative agency subpoena issued in this state.

As otherwise expressly required by law.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 162, § 5; 2007, ch. 115, § 1.

12-60-16.6.
Criminal history record information — Dissemination to parties not described in section 12-60-16.5.

Only the bureau may disseminate a criminal history record to parties not described in section 12-60-16.5. The dissemination may be made only if all the following requirements are met:

The criminal history record information has not been purged or sealed.

The criminal history record information is of a conviction, including a conviction for violating section 12.1-20-03, 12.1-20-03.1, 12.1-20-04, 12.1-20-06.1, or 12.1-20-11 notwithstanding any disposition following a deferred imposition of sentence; or the criminal history record information is of a reportable event occurring within three years preceding the request.

The request is written and contains:

The name of the requester.

The biometric data of the record subject or, if the request is made without submitting the biometric data, the request must also include the name of the record subject and at least two items of information used by the bureau to retrieve criminal history records, including:

The state identification number assigned to the record subject by the bureau.

The social security number of the record subject.

The date of birth of the record subject.

A specific reportable event identified by date and either agency or court.

The identifying information supporting a request for a criminal history record does not match the record of more than one individual.

In order to confirm a record match, the bureau may contact the requester to collect additional information if a request contains an item of information that appears to be inaccurate or incomplete. This section does not prohibit the disclosure of a criminal history record by the requester or other persons after the dissemination of the record by the bureau to the requester.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 162, § 6; 1989, ch. 160, § 1; 1997, ch. 124, § 1; 2005, ch. 110, § 1; 2005, ch. 111, § 2; 2007, ch. 115, § 2; 2009, ch. 122, § 2; 2015, ch. 96, § 4, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 96, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

12-60-16.7.
Criminal history record information — Prohibited dissemination.

If dissemination is prohibited under section 12-60-16.6, or there is no information, the bureau shall provide the following answer to the requester: “No information is available because either no information exists or dissemination is prohibited.”

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 162, § 7.

12-60-16.8.
Criminal history record information — Required disclosure of certain dissemination.

If the bureau disseminates information under section 12-60-16.6, unless the request was accompanied by an authorization on forms prescribed by the bureau and signed by the record subject, the bureau shall mail notice of that dissemination to the record subject at the last known address of the record subject.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 162, § 8.

12-60-16.9.
Criminal history record information — Fee for record check.

The bureau shall impose a fee of fifteen dollars for each state record check. The bureau shall impose a fee of five dollars for each record check for a nonprofit organization that is organized and operated in this state exclusively for charitable purposes for the exclusive benefit of minors. The bureau shall impose a fee of five dollars for each record check conducted on a volunteer providing services for a nonprofit organization that is organized and operated in this state exclusively for charitable purposes for the exclusive benefit of vulnerable elderly adults. The bureau shall impose a fee of fifteen dollars for processing biometric data necessary for each nationwide criminal history record check. The bureau shall waive the fees for any criminal justice agency or court.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 162, § 9; 1999, ch. 118, § 1; 2003, ch. 506, § 3; 2005, ch. 111, § 3; 2015, ch. 96, § 5, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 5 of chapter 96, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

12-60-16.10.
Criminal history record information — Penalty.

Any willful violation as defined in section 12.1-02-02 of any provision of sections 12-60-16.1 through 12-60-16.9 relating to reporting or disseminating criminal history record information is a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 162, § 10.

Cross-References.

Penalty for class A misdemeanor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

12-60-16.11.
Criminal history record information — Required action.

Any person offering criminal background checks for compensation, for the purpose of screening applicants seeking a position in which the applicant is responsible for providing care for a vulnerable adult, shall utilize the bureau of criminal investigation statewide criminal history data base in addition to any other compiled information. The entity shall pay any applicable fees set forth in section 12-60-16.9.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 110, § 2.

12-60-16.12.
Criminal history record information — Civil action — Penalty.

A person that disseminates, publishes, or maintains or causes to be disseminated, published, or maintained, the criminal history record information of an individual which pertains to that individual’s charge or arrest for a criminal offense, and solicits, requests, or accepts money or other thing of value for removing the criminal history record information is civilly liable to that individual in the amount of five hundred dollars or actual damages, whichever is greater, plus reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 97, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

12-60-17.
Superintendent to make rules and regulations.

The superintendent, pursuant to chapter 28-32, shall make and promulgate such rules and regulations, not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, as may be necessary and proper for the efficient performance of the bureau’s duties. Such rules and regulations must be forwarded to each state’s attorney, sheriff, marshal, or other peace officer, and each of said officers shall assist the superintendent in the performance of the superintendent’s duties by complying with such rules and regulations.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 111, § 19; 1983, ch. 556, § 2; 1989, ch. 161, § 1; 2021, ch. 175, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

12-60-18.
Money collected paid into general fund.

All moneys collected or received, including all rewards for the apprehension or conviction of any criminal earned or collected by the superintendent, the chief of the bureau, his assistants, or any employee of his office, shall be paid into the general fund of the state.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 111, § 20.

12-60-19.
Cooperation of bureau. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 556, § 6.

12-60-20.
Bureau to act as a consumer fraud bureau. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 556, § 6.

12-60-21.
State crime laboratory. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 469, § 13.

12-60-22.
Provision of laboratory facilities and technical personnel — Request. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 469, § 13.

12-60-23.
Bureau to maintain registry of protection orders, orders prohibiting contact, and restraining orders.

The bureau shall maintain a registry of all orders of which it receives notice under sections 11-15-32, 12.1-31.2-02, 14-07.1-02, and 14-07.1-03.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 113, § 2; 2017, ch. 107, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.